Maryland, session 2026, SB0397.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
2–315.
(a) This section applies only in Anne Arundel County.
(c) (1) The Sheriff shall appoint deputies at a salary as provided by the County
Council of Anne Arundel County.
(2) The Sheriff may appoint a chief deputy who shall serve at the pleasure
of the Sheriff.
(3) THE SHERIFF SHALL APPOINT THREE MAJORS AT A SALARY AS
PROVIDED BY THE COUNTY COUNCIL OF ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 12, 2026.
– 1 –